Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 10 State Forests and Forestry Projects

2-10-1.
Acceptance of property for demonstration and experimentation purposes.

The director of environmental management is authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor, and subject, in the case of real property, to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37, to accept on behalf of the state any property given to the
state absolutely and in fee simple for general forest demonstration and experimentation purposes, but no acceptance makes the state in any manner legally or equitably liable to any person relative to the care, preservation or use of
the property. All deeds, contracts and other documents in connection with the transfer of the property shall be approved by the attorney general.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 6; P.L. 1931, ch. 1764, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-1

.

2-10-2.
Use of property.

Property accepted pursuant to §

2-10-1

shall be used by the department of environmental management under the supervision of the director, for any forest demonstration and experimentation purposes that they deem best designed to promote the science and practice
of forestry in this state.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 7; P.L. 1931, ch. 1764, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-2

; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 8.

2-10-3.
State forestry fund.

Whenever appropriate receipts, monetary gifts, or securities are received, the director of environmental management shall give the funds to the general treasurer until he or she desires to use the funds for forest demonstration and experimentation purposes
and the general treasurer shall keep those funds in a special account known as the state forestry fund, and he or she shall invest and reinvest the funds in those securities that by law the sinking fund commission is authorized to
invest in. Whenever the director desires to convert any of those investments into cash to be used to promote the science and practice of forestry in this state, the director shall notify the general treasurer in writing who shall forthwith
proceed to carry out his or her request. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment from those investments of any of those sums upon receipt by him or her of
proper vouchers approved by the director.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1764, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 200; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-3

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 1.

2-10-3.1.
Assessment of fees for forestry services.

The director of the department of environmental management shall promulgate regulations for the purposes of assessing fees for services provided by the division of forest environment as outlined in chapters 15 and 19 of this title, as well as for services
provided by the division of forest environment for the protection, enhancement, and management of this state’s forest resources and these funds shall be deposited within the state forestry fund as provided for in §

2-10-3

.

History of Section.
P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 2.

2-10-4.
State forest areas acquired from United States.

For the purpose of cooperating with the United States government in the proper utilization of lands in this state suitable for the maintenance of forest areas, the director of environmental management is authorized and empowered, with the approval of
the governor and irrespective of any other provision of law, to acquire, without expense to the state except a nominal consideration, by deed or lease from, or by agreement with, the United States or any authorized agency of the
United States, lands or interests in lands in this state which in the judgment of the director and the governor are suitable for use for the purpose of, or in connection with, the establishment or maintenance of state forests or
forest areas, and to use those lands or interests in lands so acquired, or to cause them to be used, for general forest demonstration and experimental purposes and in any other ways that in the judgment of the director and the
governor will be most suitable for state forests or forest areas and will best promote the public good.

The director is authorized and empowered to sell or otherwise dispose of products from state forests or forest areas, and to make any rules and regulations that may be necessary in connection with the land.

Revenues received from state forests and forest areas shall be turned over to the general treasurer and placed in a fund to be known as the state forestry fund.

A special record shall be kept as to those revenues when there is an obligation in connection with those revenues to reimburse the United States, and payment shall be made to the United States in accordance with the terms of the agreement entered into
between the director and the United States.

When the purchase price, which shall not exceed the amount expended by the United States in the acquisition of the lands, has been repaid, title to the lands shall be taken in the name of the state.

Revenues received from state forests or forest areas beyond those required to reimburse the United States shall be expended for the maintenance and development of state forests and forest areas whenever the agreement between the director and the United
States requires it.

Obligations for the acquisition of lands under the authority of this chapter shall be paid solely from revenues derived from those lands, and shall not impose any liability on the general credit and taxing power of the state. Revenues received from state
forests and forest areas, where there is no obligation to reimburse the United States, shall be deposited in a fund known as the state forestry fund.

All deeds, contracts and other agreements in connection with the transfer of state forests or forest areas shall be approved as to form by the attorney general.

All civil and criminal processes issued under the authority of this state or of any department or officer of this state may be served and executed on state forests or forest areas and in any buildings or structures in state forests or forest areas.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 9; P.L. 1935, ch. 2262, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-4

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 1.

2-10-5.
Acquisition of property — Acceptance of grants and gifts.

The director of environmental management, with the approval of the governor, is authorized and empowered, subject to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37, to acquire by rental, lease or purchase any property which in the judgment of the director and
the governor is suitable for use in the establishment and maintenance of camp sites in connection with the work of any public agency engaged in conservation projects or in the establishment and maintenance of forest areas for any
purposes that may be required by law.

The director may also accept any allotment or grant of money from the United States government for the purchase and development of property for the uses stated.

The director may accept gifts of money as provided in §

2-10-1

.

All sums of money accepted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be turned over to the general treasurer and placed in a special fund known as the state forestry fund.

The director, from the funds received under the provisions of this chapter, may expend sums of money for the purchase of forest lands and for the purpose of development of the property acquired for forest stewardship programs and for the maintenance of
state forests.

All deeds, contracts and other documents in connection with the transfer of property shall be approved as to form by the attorney general.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 10; P.L. 1935, ch. 2218, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 3105, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-5

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 1.

2-10-6.
Deposit of forest revenues.

The director of environmental management shall deposit with the general treasurer in the state forestry fund as provided for in §

2-10-3

all moneys received from the sale of forest products cut in the state forests, state forest parks or other reservations within the state, and receipts from the sale of land belonging to the state and used for forest purposes.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 8; P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 2; P.L. 1944, ch. 1443, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-6

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 1.

2-10-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.
G.L. 1956, ch. 223, § 9; P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 2; 1944, ch. 1443, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1966, ch. 224, § 1.

2-10-8.
Receipt of federal grants.

The general treasurer is authorized to receive any moneys that may be placed at the disposal of the state by the United States government, or any department of the United States, under the provisions of any law, cooperative agreement or otherwise, for
the purpose of protecting, preserving or developing the woodlands and forestry in this state.

History of Section. P.L. 1909, ch. 451, § 15; P.L. 1922, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 281, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 224, § 15; P.L. 1944, ch. 1444, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-8

.

2-10-9.
Receipts from land condemned by United States.

Any sums received by the state as the proceeds resulting from the condemnation by the federal government, or any agency or agent of the federal government, of any lands, under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental management shall be deposited
in the general fund.

History of Section. P.L. 1944, ch. 1492, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 1, 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-9

; P.L. 1959, ch. 134, § 1.

2-10-10.
[Obsolete.]

2-10-11.
Purchase and sale of seedlings.

For the purpose of encouraging reforestation, the director of environmental management is authorized and empowered to purchase, and resell at cost to the owners of any farm or woodlands in this state, tree seedlings to be planted on those farms or land.
Nothing in this section authorizes the director to incur any obligation for the payment of any sum by the state nor to charge any fee or profit for his or her services under this section.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 5; P.L. 1928, ch. 1136, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-11

.

2-10-12.
Operation of nurseries.

The state is authorized to establish, operate and maintain nurseries for the production of forest seedlings. Those trees may be used to reforest any land owned by the state, or may be used for planting on other public lands any such terms deemed to be
for the public benefit. Any surplus may be supplied to owners of private land, at a price not exceeding the cost of production, for reforestation purposes upon rural land which has an assessed value of not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00)
per acre. Trees so purchased by owners of private land for reforestation of rural land shall not be removed from the premises of the rural landowner with the roots attached.

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 280, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2609, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 9; G.L., ch. 223, § 12, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-12

.

2-10-13.
Enforcement.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management or his or her authorized representative to enforce the provisions of this chapter and of chapter 15 of this title and to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation, that, in his or her opinion,
is guilty of the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, and in all those prosecutions the director or the director’s authorized representative is not required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for costs.
It is the duty of the attorney general to conduct the prosecution brought by the director under the provisions of this chapter and of chapter 15 of this title.

History of Section. P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 103; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 10; G.L., ch. 223, § 13, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-10-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 172, § 2.